Illinois, session 104th, SB1297.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Comptroller Act is amended by 5changing Section 21 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 405/21)  (from Ch. 15, par. 221)7    Sec. 21. Rules and Regulations - Imprest accounts. The 8Comptroller shall promulgate rules and regulations to 9implement the exercise of his or her powers and performance of 10his or her duties under this Act and to guide and assist State 11agencies in complying with this Act. Any rule or regulation 12specifically requiring the approval of the State Treasurer 13under this Act for adoption by the Comptroller shall require 14the approval of the State Treasurer for modification or 15repeal.16    The Comptroller may provide in his or her rules and 17regulations for periodic transfers, with the approval of the 18State Treasurer, for use in accordance with the imprest 19system, subject to the rules and regulations of the 20Comptroller as respects vouchers, controls and reports, as 21follows: 22        (a) To the University of Illinois, Southern Illinois 23    University, Chicago State University, Eastern Illinois   SB1297- 2 -LRB104 08837 BDA 18892 b1    University, Governors State University, Illinois State 2    University, Northeastern Illinois University, Northern 3    Illinois University, Western Illinois University, and 4    State Community College of East St. Louis under the 5    jurisdiction of the Illinois Community College Board 6    (abolished under Section 2-12.1 of the Public Community 7    College Act), not to exceed $200,000 for each campus. 8        (b) To the Department of Agriculture and the 9    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for the 10    operation and closing of overseas offices, not to exceed 11    $500,000 for each Department for each overseas office. 12        (c) To the Department of Agriculture for the purpose 13    of making change for activities at each State Fair, not to 14    exceed $200,000, to be returned within 5 days of the 15    termination of such activity. 16        (d) To the Department of Agriculture to pay (i) State 17    Fair premiums and awards, State Fair competition 18    personnel, and State Fair entertainment contracts, and 19    entertainment support contracts necessary to provide the 20    entertainment at each State Fair, and (ii) ticket refunds 21    for cancelled events. The amount transferred from any fund 22    shall not exceed the appropriation for each specific 23    purpose. This authorization shall terminate each year 24    within 60 days of the close of each State Fair. The 25    Department shall be responsible for withholding State 26    income tax, where necessary, as required by Section 709 of   SB1297- 3 -LRB104 08837 BDA 18892 b1    the Illinois Income Tax Act. 2        (e) To the State Treasurer to pay for securities' 3    safekeeping charges assessed by the Board of Governors of 4    the Federal Reserve System as a consequence of the 5    Treasurer's use of the government securities' book-entry 6    system. This account shall not exceed $25,000. 7        (f) To the Illinois Mathematics and Science Academy, 8    not to exceed $100,000. 9        (g) To the Department of Natural Resources to pay out 10    cash prizes associated with competitions held at the World 11    Shooting and Recreational Complex, to purchase awards 12    associated with competitions held at the World Shooting 13    and Recreational Complex, to pay State and national 14    membership dues associated with competitions held at the 15    World Shooting and Recreational Complex, and to pay State 16    and national membership target fees associated with 17    competitions held at the World Shooting and Recreational 18    Complex. The amount of funds advanced to the account 19    created by this subsection (g) must not exceed $250,000 in 20    any fiscal year. 21(Source: P.A. 96-785, eff. 8-28-09; 96-1118, eff. 7-20-10; 2297-72, eff. 7-1-11; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 242025.